apertium-tur.tur.twol
! ev>{s}{I}         = evi      =      e:e v:v >:0 {s}:0 {I}:i
! ada>{s}{I}        = adası    =  a:a d:d a:a >:0 {s}:s {I}:ı
! adam>{N}{I}n      = adamın   = 
! akü>{N}{I}n       = akünün   = 
! kitap>{y}{I}      = kitabı   = 
! anne>{y}{I}       = anneyi   = 
! Sofya'>y{I}       = Sofya'yı 
! ner>ede>{y}>l{A}r = neredeler 
!@ 9:9 2:2 {ь}:0 %:% -:- >:0 {y}:y {I}:i
!@ 2 6 {ı}:0 % - >:0 {s}:s {I}:ı {n}:0
!@ z e n g i n l i k {v}:0 >:0 l {A}:e r >:0 {s}:0 {I}:i {n}:n >:0 {D}:d {A}:e n
!@ 3 {ö}:0 {p}:0 ' >:0 {s}:0 {I}:ü {n}:0

"Prevocalic consonant voicing"
!Cx:Cy <=> :Vow (:0) _ %{v%}: %>: (:0) :SurVow ;
!Cx:Cy <=> _ %{v%}:0/[ :0 - %{v%}:0 ] :SurVow ;
! because the immediately above thing doesn't seem to work right,
!   you need to put %{v%} RIGHT AFTER the consonant that voices:
!   no other :0 stuff can intervene
Cx:Cy <=> _ %{v%}:0 [ :0 - %{v%}:0 ]* :SurVow ;
          except
                 :n _ %{v%}: %>: (:0) :SurVow ;
          where Cx in ( t k ç p g  )
                Cy in ( d ğ c b ğ   )
                matched;

! kitab>            = kitap
! kitab>{D}{A}n     = kitaptan   = 

"Alternative voicing of 'k' to 'g' after 'n'"
k:g <=> :n _ %{v%}: %>: (:0) :Vow ;

! renk>{y}{I}       = rengi    =

"Buffer N after 3rd singular possessive + acc/dat/loc/abl"
%{n%}:n <=>  _ %>: [ %{y%}: %{I%}: | %{y%}: %{A%}: | %{D%}: %{A%}: ] ; 

! arka>{s}{I}{n}>{D}{A}     = arkasında = a:a r:r k:k a:a >:0 {s}:s {I}:ı {n}:n >:0 {D}:d {A}:a
! yap>m{A}>{s}{I}{n}>{y}{I} = yapmasını = y:y a:a p:p >:0 m:m {A}:a >:0 {s}:s {I}:ı {n}:n >:0 {y}:0 {I}:ı
! memelerinden
! arabasında

"Consonant alternation in passive"
%{L%}:n <=>  [ :Vow | :l ]  %>: _ ;
             [ :Vow | :l ]  %>: %{i%}: _ ; 
             [ %{e%}: | :Vow | :l ]  %>: %{i%}:i _ ; 

"Deletion of stem vowel before -{I}yor"
Vx:0 <=> _ %>: %{I%}: y:y o:o r:r  ;
       where Vx in ( a e i o u ı ö ü ) ;

"Deletion of %{A%} before -{I}yor and after a vowel"
%{A%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{I%}: y:y o:o r:r ;
 	        ! oyna>{I}yor    = oynuyor = o:o y:y n:n a:0 >:0 {I}:u y:y o:o r:r
           :Vow/[ :0 - [ AbstrCns: | AbstrVow: ] ]  _ ;
           ! başla>{A}y{I}m = başlayım

"Special treatment of {в} for su"
%{в%}:0 <=> _ .#. ; 
